Hawaii statutes.
§179D-9 Enactment of rules. The
department shall adopt the necessary rules not later than one and one-half
years after July 1, 2007. [L 1987, c 199, pt of §1; am L 2007, c 262, §10]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next